Utah statutes.
30-1-1.   Incestuous marriages void.

 (1)  The following marriages are incestuous and void from the beginning, whether the relationship is legitimate or illegitimate:

(a)  marriages between parents and children;

(b)  marriages between ancestors and descendants of every degree;

(c)  marriages between brothers and sisters of the half as well as the whole blood;

(d)  marriages between uncles and nieces or aunts and nephews;

(e)  marriages between first cousins, except as provided in Subsection (2); or

(f)  marriages between any persons related to each other within and not including the fifth degree of consanguinity computed according to the rules of the civil law, except as provided in Subsection (2).

(2)  First cousins may marry under the following circumstances:

(a)  both parties are 65 years of age or older; or

(b)  if both parties are 55 years of age or older, upon a finding by the district court, located in the district in which either party resides, that either party is unable to reproduce.

